Indiana, session 2026, HB1023.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-12-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 16. (a) Except as
provided in section 40.5 of this chapter, a surviving spouse may have
the sum of eighteen thousand seven hundred twenty dollars ($18,720)
deducted from the assessed value of the surviving spouse's tangible
property, or real property, mobile home not assessed as real property,
or manufactured home not assessed as real property that the surviving
spouse is buying under a contract that provides that the surviving
spouse is to pay property taxes on the real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home, if the contract or a memorandum of the contract
is recorded in the county recorder's office, and if:
(1) the deceased spouse served in the military or naval forces of
the United States before November 12, 1918;
(2) the deceased spouse received an honorable discharge; and
(3) the surviving spouse:
(A) owns the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
2026 IN 1023—LS 6108/DI 129


home; or
(B) is buying the real property, mobile home, or manufactured
home under contract;
on the date the statement required by section 17 of this chapter is
filed.
(b) A surviving spouse who receives the deduction provided by this
section may not receive the deduction provided by section 13 of this
chapter. However, the surviving spouse may receive any other
deduction which the surviving spouse is entitled to by law.
(c) An individual who has sold real property, a mobile home not
assessed as real property, or a manufactured home not assessed as real
property to another person under a contract that provides that the
contract buyer is to pay the property taxes on the real property, mobile
home, or manufactured home may not claim the deduction provided
under this section against that real property, mobile home, or
manufactured home.
(d) This section applies only to property taxes imposed for an
assessment date before January 1, 2025.
(e) This section expires January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-12-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 17. (a) Except as
provided in section 17.8 of this chapter and subject to section 45 of this
chapter, a surviving spouse who desires to claim the deduction
provided by section 16 of this chapter must file a statement with the
auditor of the county in which the surviving spouse resides. To obtain
the deduction for a desired calendar year in which property taxes are
first due and payable, the statement must be completed, dated, and filed
with the county auditor on or before January 15 of the calendar year in
which the property taxes are first due and payable. The statement may
be filed in person or by mail. If mailed, the mailing must be postmarked
on or before the last day for filing. The statement shall contain:
(1) a sworn statement that the surviving spouse is entitled to the
deduction; and
(2) the record number and page where the contract or
memorandum of the contract is recorded, if the individual is
buying the real property on a contract that provides that the
individual is to pay property taxes on the real property.
In addition to the statement, the surviving spouse shall submit to the
county auditor for the auditor's inspection a letter or certificate from the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs establishing the service
of the deceased spouse in the military or naval forces of the United
2026 IN 1023—LS 6108/DI 129


States before November 12, 1918.
(b) This section applies only to property taxes imposed for an
assessment date before January 1, 2025.
(c) This section expires January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. IC 6-1.1-12-17.8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 35, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 17.8. (a) An individual
who receives a deduction provided under section 9 (before its
expiration), 11 (before its expiration), 13, 14, 16, (before its
expiration), 17.4 (before its expiration), or 37 of this chapter in a
particular year and who remains eligible for the deduction in the
following year is not required to file a statement to apply for the
deduction in the following year. However, for purposes of a deduction
under section 37 of this chapter, the county auditor may, in the county
auditor's discretion, terminate the deduction for assessment dates after
January 15, 2012, if the individual does not comply with the
requirement in IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January 1, 2015), as
determined by the county auditor, before January 1, 2013. Before the
county auditor terminates the deduction because the taxpayer claiming
the deduction did not comply with the requirement in
IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January 1, 2015) before January 1, 2013,
the county auditor shall mail notice of the proposed termination of the
deduction to:
(1) the last known address of each person liable for any property
taxes or special assessment, as shown on the tax duplicate or
special assessment records; or
(2) the last known address of the most recent owner shown in the
transfer book.
(b) An individual who receives a deduction provided under section
9 (before its expiration), 11 (before its expiration), 13, 14, 16, (before
its expiration), or 17.4 (before its expiration) of this chapter in a
particular year and who becomes ineligible for the deduction in the
following year shall notify the auditor of the county in which the real
property, mobile home, or manufactured home for which the individual
claims the deduction is located of the individual's ineligibility in the
year in which the individual becomes ineligible. An individual who
becomes ineligible for a deduction under section 37 of this chapter
shall notify the county auditor of the county in which the property is
located in conformity with section 37 of this chapter.
(c) The auditor of each county shall, in a particular year, apply a
deduction provided under section 9 (before its expiration), 11 (before
its expiration), 13, 14, 16, (before its expiration), 17.4 (before its
2026 IN 1023—LS 6108/DI 129


expiration), or 37 of this chapter to each individual who received the
deduction in the preceding year unless the auditor determines that the
individual is no longer eligible for the deduction.
(d) An individual who receives a deduction provided under section
9 (before its expiration), 11 (before its expiration), 13, 14, 16, (before
its expiration), 17.4 (before its expiration), or 37 of this chapter for
property that is jointly held with another owner in a particular year and
remains eligible for the deduction in the following year is not required
to file a statement to reapply for the deduction following the removal
of the joint owner if:
(1) the individual is the sole owner of the property following the
death of the individual's spouse; or
(2) the individual is the sole owner of the property following the
death of a joint owner who was not the individual's spouse.
If a county auditor terminates a deduction under section 9 of this
chapter (before its expiration), a deduction under section 37 of this
chapter, or a credit under IC 6-1.1-20.6-8.5 after June 30, 2017, and
before May 1, 2019, because the taxpayer claiming the deduction or
credit did not comply with a requirement added to this subsection by
P.L.255-2017 to reapply for the deduction or credit, the county auditor
shall reinstate the deduction or credit if the taxpayer provides proof that
the taxpayer is eligible for the deduction or credit and is not claiming
the deduction or credit for any other property.
(e) A trust entitled to a deduction under section 9 (before its
expiration), 11 (before its expiration), 13, 14, 16, (before its
expiration), 17.4 (before its expiration), or 37 of this chapter for real
property owned by the trust and occupied by an individual in
accordance with section 17.9 of this chapter (before its expiration) is
not required to file a statement to apply for the deduction, if:
(1) the individual who occupies the real property receives a
deduction provided under section 9 (before its expiration), 11
(before its expiration), 13, 14, 16, (before its expiration), 17.4
(before its expiration), or 37 of this chapter in a particular year;
and
(2) the trust remains eligible for the deduction in the following
year.
However, for purposes of a deduction under section 37 of this chapter,
the individuals that qualify the trust for a deduction must comply with
the requirement in IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January 1, 2015)
before January 1, 2013.
(f) A cooperative housing corporation (as defined in 26 U.S.C. 216)
that is entitled to a deduction under section 37 of this chapter in the
2026 IN 1023—LS 6108/DI 129


immediately preceding calendar year for a homestead (as defined in
section 37 of this chapter) is not required to file a statement to apply for
the deduction for the current calendar year if the cooperative housing
corporation remains eligible for the deduction for the current calendar
year. However, the county auditor may, in the county auditor's
discretion, terminate the deduction for assessment dates after January
15, 2012, if the individual does not comply with the requirement in
IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January 1, 2015), as determined by the
county auditor, before January 1, 2013. Before the county auditor
terminates a deduction because the taxpayer claiming the deduction did
not comply with the requirement in IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired
January 1, 2015) before January 1, 2013, the county auditor shall mail
notice of the proposed termination of the deduction to:
(1) the last known address of each person liable for any property
taxes or special assessment, as shown on the tax duplicate or
special assessment records; or
(2) the last known address of the most recent owner shown in the
transfer book.
(g) An individual who:
(1) was eligible for a homestead credit under IC 6-1.1-20.9
(repealed) for property taxes imposed for the March 1, 2007, or
January 15, 2008, assessment date; or
(2) would have been eligible for a homestead credit under
IC 6-1.1-20.9 (repealed) for property taxes imposed for the March
1, 2008, or January 15, 2009, assessment date if IC 6-1.1-20.9 had
not been repealed;
is not required to file a statement to apply for a deduction under section
37 of this chapter if the individual remains eligible for the deduction in
the current year. An individual who filed for a homestead credit under
IC 6-1.1-20.9 (repealed) for an assessment date after March 1, 2007 (if
the property is real property), or after January 1, 2008 (if the property
is personal property), shall be treated as an individual who has filed for
a deduction under section 37 of this chapter. However, the county
auditor may, in the county auditor's discretion, terminate the deduction
for assessment dates after January 15, 2012, if the individual does not
comply with the requirement in IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January
1, 2015), as determined by the county auditor, before January 1, 2013.
Before the county auditor terminates the deduction because the
taxpayer claiming the deduction did not comply with the requirement
in IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January 1, 2015) before January 1,
2013, the county auditor shall mail notice of the proposed termination
of the deduction to the last known address of each person liable for any
2026 IN 1023—LS 6108/DI 129


property taxes or special assessment, as shown on the tax duplicate or
special assessment records, or to the last known address of the most
recent owner shown in the transfer book.
(h) If a county auditor terminates a deduction because the taxpayer
claiming the deduction did not comply with the requirement in
IC 6-1.1-22-8.1(b)(9) (expired January 1, 2015) before January 1, 2013,
the county auditor shall reinstate the deduction if the taxpayer provides
proof that the taxpayer is eligible for the deduction and is not claiming
the deduction for any other property.
(i) A taxpayer described in section 37(r) of this chapter is not
required to file a statement to apply for the deduction provided by
section 37 of this chapter if the property owned by the taxpayer remains
eligible for the deduction for that calendar year.
(j) A surviving spouse who received the deduction provided by
section 16 of this chapter for the January 1, 2024, assessment date
is not required to file a statement to reapply for the deduction to
receive the deduction for the January 1, 2025, assessment date. The
county auditor shall apply the deduction provided by section 16 of
this chapter for the surviving spouse for the January 1, 2025,
assessment date on the surviving spouse's property tax statement
for property taxes first due and payable in 2026.
SECTION 4. IC 6-1.1-12-17.9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 17.9. A trust is entitled
to a deduction under section 9 (before its expiration), 11 (before its
expiration), 13, 14, 16, (before its expiration), or 17.4 (before its
expiration) of this chapter for real property owned by the trust and
occupied by an individual if the county auditor determines that the
individual:
(1) upon verification in the body of the deed or otherwise, has
either:
(A) a beneficial interest in the trust; or
(B) the right to occupy the real property rent free under the
terms of a qualified personal residence trust created by the
individual under United States Treasury Regulation
25.2702-5(c)(2); and
(2) otherwise qualifies for the deduction.
SECTION 5. IC 6-1.1-12-43, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 37, AND AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025, SECTION
292, IS CORRECTED AND AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 43. (a) For
purposes of this section:
2026 IN 1023—LS 6108/DI 129


(1) "benefit" refers to a deduction under section 9 (before its
expiration), 11 (before its expiration), 13, (before its expiration),
14, (before its expiration), 16, (before its expiration), 17.4 (before
its expiration), 26 (before its expiration), 29 (before its
expiration), 33 (before its expiration), 34 (before its expiration),
37, or 37.5 of this chapter;
(2) "closing agent" means a person that closes a transaction;
(3) "customer" means an individual who obtains a loan in a
transaction; and
(4) "transaction" means a single family residential:
(A) first lien purchase money mortgage transaction; or
(B) refinancing transaction.
(b) Before closing a transaction after December 31, 2004, a closing
agent must provide to the customer the form referred to in subsection
(c).
(c) Before June 1, 2004, the department of local government finance
shall prescribe the form to be provided by closing agents to customers
under subsection (b). The department shall make the form available to
closing agents, county assessors, county auditors, and county treasurers
in hard copy and electronic form. County assessors, county auditors,
and county treasurers shall make the form available to the general
public. The form must:
(1) on one (1) side:
(A) list each benefit; and
(B) list the eligibility criteria for each benefit;
(2) on the other side indicate:
(A) each action by and each type of documentation from the
customer required to file for each benefit; and
(B) sufficient instructions and information to permit a party to
terminate a standard deduction under section 37 of this chapter
on any property on which the party or the spouse of the party
will no longer be eligible for the standard deduction under
section 37 of this chapter after the party or the party's spouse
begins to reside at the property that is the subject of the
closing, including an explanation of the tax consequences and
applicable penalties, if a party unlawfully claims a standard
deduction under section 37 of this chapter; and
(3) be printed in one (1) of two (2) or more colors prescribed by
the department of local government finance that distinguish the
form from other documents typically used in a closing referred to
in subsection (b).
(d) A closing agent:
2026 IN 1023—LS 6108/DI 129


(1) may reproduce the form referred to in subsection (c);
(2) in reproducing the form, must use a print color prescribed by
the department of local government finance; and
(3) is not responsible for the content of the form referred to in
subsection (c) and shall be held harmless by the department of
local government finance from any liability for the content of the
form.
(e) This subsection applies to a transaction that is closed after
December 31, 2009. In addition to providing the customer the form
described in subsection (c) before closing the transaction, a closing
agent shall do the following as soon as possible after the closing, and
within the time prescribed by the department of insurance under
IC 27-7-3-15.5:
(1) To the extent determinable, input the information described in
IC 27-7-3-15.5(c)(2) into the system maintained by the
department of insurance under IC 27-7-3-15.5.
(2) Submit the form described in IC 27-7-3-15.5(c) to the data
base described in IC 27-7-3-15.5(c)(2)(D).
(f) A closing agent to which this section applies shall document the
closing agent's compliance with this section with respect to each
transaction in the form of verification of compliance signed by the
customer.
(g) Subject to IC 27-7-3-15.5(d), a closing agent is subject to a civil
penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each instance in which the
closing agent fails to comply with this section with respect to a
customer. The penalty:
(1) may be enforced by the state agency that has administrative
jurisdiction over the closing agent in the same manner that the
agency enforces the payment of fees or other penalties payable to
the agency; and
(2) shall be paid into:
(A) the state general fund, if the closing agent fails to comply
with subsection (b); or
(B) the home ownership education account established by
IC 5-20-1-27, if the closing agent fails to comply with
subsection (e) in a transaction that is closed after December
31, 2009.
(h) A closing agent is not liable for any other damages claimed by
a customer because of:
(1) the closing agent's mere failure to provide the appropriate
document to the customer under subsection (b); or
(2) with respect to a transaction that is closed after December 31,
2026 IN 1023—LS 6108/DI 129


2009, the closing agent's failure to input the information or
submit the form described in subsection (e).
(i) The state agency that has administrative jurisdiction over a
closing agent shall:
(1) examine the closing agent to determine compliance with this
section; and
(2) impose and collect penalties under subsection (g).
SECTION 6. IC 6-1.1-12-46, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 38, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 46. (a) This section
applies to real property for an assessment date in 2011 or a later year
if:
(1) the real property is not exempt from property taxation for the
assessment date;
(2) title to the real property is transferred after the assessment date
and on or before the December 31 that next succeeds the
assessment date;
(3) the transferee of the real property applies for an exemption
under IC 6-1.1-11 for the next succeeding assessment date; and
(4) the county property tax assessment board of appeals
determines that the real property is exempt from property taxation
for that next succeeding assessment date.
(b) For the assessment date referred to in subsection (a)(1), real
property is eligible for any deductions for which the transferor under
subsection (a)(2) was eligible for that assessment date under the
following:
(1) IC 6-1.1-12-1 (before its repeal).
(2) IC 6-1.1-12-9 (before its expiration).
(3) IC 6-1.1-12-11 (before its expiration).
(4) IC 6-1.1-12-13.
(5) IC 6-1.1-12-14.
(6) IC 6-1.1-12-16. (before its expiration).
(7) IC 6-1.1-12-17.4 (before its expiration).
(8) IC 6-1.1-12-18 (before its expiration).
(9) IC 6-1.1-12-22 (before its expiration).
(10) IC 6-1.1-12-37.
(11) IC 6-1.1-12-37.5.
(c) For the payment date applicable to the assessment date referred
to in subsection (a)(1), real property is eligible for the credit for
excessive residential property taxes under IC 6-1.1-20.6 for which the
transferor under subsection (a)(2) would be eligible for that payment
date if the transfer had not occurred.
2026 IN 1023—LS 6108/DI 129


SECTION 7. IC 6-6-5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 87, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 5. A person that owns a
vehicle and that is entitled to a property tax deduction under
IC 6-1.1-12-13, IC 6-1.1-12-14, or IC 6-1.1-12-16 (before its
expiration) is entitled to a credit against the vehicle excise tax as
follows: Any remaining deduction from assessed valuation to which the
person is entitled, applicable to property taxes payable in the year in
which the excise tax imposed by this chapter is due, after allowance of
the deduction on real estate and personal property owned by the person,
shall reduce the vehicle excise tax in the amount of two dollars ($2) on
each one hundred dollars ($100) of taxable value or major portion
thereof. The county auditor shall, upon request, furnish a certified
statement to the person verifying the credit allowable under this
section, and the statement shall be presented to and retained by the
bureau to support the credit.
SECTION 8. IC 6-6-5-5.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 88, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 5.2. (a) This section
applies to a registration year beginning after December 31, 2013.
(b) Subject to subsection (d), an individual may claim a credit
against the tax imposed by this chapter upon a vehicle owned by the
individual if the individual is eligible for the credit under any of the
following:
(1) The individual meets all the following requirements:
(A) The individual served in the military or naval forces of the
United States during any of its wars.
(B) The individual received an honorable discharge.
(C) The individual has a disability with a service connected
disability of ten percent (10%) or more.
(D) The individual's disability is evidenced by:
(i) a pension certificate, an award of compensation, or a
disability compensation check issued by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(ii) a certificate of eligibility issued to the individual by the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs after the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs has determined that the
individual's disability qualifies the individual to receive a
credit under this section.
(E) The individual does not own property to which a property
tax deduction may be applied under IC 6-1.1-12-13.
(2) The individual meets all the following requirements:
2026 IN 1023—LS 6108/DI 129


(A) The individual served in the military or naval forces of the
United States for at least ninety (90) days.
(B) The individual received an honorable discharge.
(C) The individual either:
(i) has a total disability; or
(ii) is at least sixty-two (62) years of age and has a disability
of at least ten percent (10%).
(D) The individual's disability is evidenced by:
(i) a pension certificate or an award of compensation issued
by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(ii) a certificate of eligibility issued to the individual by the
Indiana department of veterans' affairs after the Indiana
department of veterans' affairs has determined that the
individual's disability qualifies the individual to receive a
credit under this section.
(E) The individual does not own property to which a property
tax deduction may be applied under IC 6-1.1-12-14.
(3) The individual meets both of the following requirements:
(A) The individual is the surviving spouse of any of the
following:
(i) An individual who would have been eligible for a credit
under this section if the individual had been alive in 2013
and this section had been in effect in 2013.
(ii) An individual who received a credit under this section in
the previous calendar year.
(iii) A World War I veteran.
(B) The individual does not own property to which a property
tax deduction may be applied under IC 6-1.1-12-13,
IC 6-1.1-12-14, or IC 6-1.1-12-16. (before its expiration).
(c) The amount of the credit that may be claimed under this section
is equal to the lesser of the following:
(1) The amount of the excise tax liability for the individual's
vehicle as determined under section 3 or 3.5 of this chapter, as
applicable.
(2) Seventy dollars ($70).
(d) The maximum number of motor vehicles for which an individual
may claim a credit under this section is two (2).
(e) An individual may not claim a credit under both:
(1) this section; and
(2) section 5 of this chapter.
(f) The credit allowed by this section must be claimed on a form
prescribed by the bureau. An individual claiming the credit must attach
2026 IN 1023—LS 6108/DI 129


to the form an affidavit from the county auditor stating that the
claimant does not own property to which a property tax deduction may
be applied under IC 6-1.1-12-13, IC 6-1.1-12-14, or IC 6-1.1-12-16.
(before its expiration).
SECTION 9. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1023—LS 6108/DI 129